Massachusetts, session 194th, H2455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The department of public health shall issue guidance to businesses in the
commonwealth regarding best practices for food donation, and state and federal policies
concerning liability protections when donating food.
The guidance shall include, but not be limited to, a review of:
(i) state and federal liability protection laws in place concerning food donation;
(ii) the community benefits of food donation, including, but not limited to, reducing food
waste, and providing food for those in need;
(iii) incentives for businesses to donate surplus food;
of 3

(iv) federal, state, and local regulations for safe food handling of food donations;
(v) best practices of food donation;
(vi) the types of food and produce that may be donated by businesses;
(vii) and contact information for staff at the department of public health that businesses
can reach out to with questions regarding food donation best practices and liability protections.
SECTION 2. The commissioner of the department of public health shall establish how
said guidelines regarding food donation by businesses be distributed to Massachusetts
establishments in a manner that ensures that they are easily accessible. The commissioner shall
also ensure that said guidelines are posted on the department of public health’s website. The
guidelines shall be developed, distributed, and posted by the department of public health no later
than 6 months within the passage of this act.
SECTION 3. The department of public health shall conduct educational webinars for
health agents and local boards of health regarding best practices and strategies for implementing
effective and safe policies and programs regarding food donation. The commissioner of the
department of public health shall determine the educational content that shall be included in said
webinars, and the frequency with which they shall be held, provided that, said webinars are held
a minimum of 4 times per calendar year.
SECTION 4. The department of public health shall develop and implement a state-wide
educational campaign to conduct targeted outreach to Massachusetts businesses and consumers
to teach them about the importance of reducing food waste and how they can play a role in
of 3

reducing food waste. The commissioner of the department of public health shall ensure that the
campaign is developed and implemented no later than 12 months within the passage of this act.
of 3